Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.545.050

Amounts due from nonhigh districts.

Each year at such time as the superintendent of public instruction determines and certifies such maximum allowable amounts of school district levies under RCW 84.52.0531 he or she shall also:

(1) Determine the extent to which the estimated amounts due by nonhigh school districts for the previous school year exceeded or fell short of the actual amounts due; and

(2) Determine the estimated amounts due by nonhigh school districts for the current school year and increase or decrease the same to the extent of overpayments or underpayments for the previous school year.

[ 1985 c 341 s 11; 1981 c 264 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.44.170.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 264: See note following RCW 28A.545.030.